Maryland, session 2026, HB0064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on Education Funding and Student Population Growth.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House; and
(3) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the State Department of Education;
(ii) one representative of the Maryland Association of Boards of
Education;
(iii) one representative of the Maryland State Education Association;
(iv) one representative of the Free State PTA;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0064*

HOUSE BILL 64
(v) one representative of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(vi) one representative of the Maryland Association of School
Personnel Administrators;
(vii) one representative of the Public School Superintendents’
Association of Maryland;
(viii) one representative of the general public; and
(ix) one representative of the Office of the Comptroller.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Office of the Governor shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) analyze challenges related to the delay in student enrollment counts
and its effect on school funding;
(2) analyze the connection between growing student populations and the
provision of school funding; and
(3) make recommendations regarding improvements to the provision of
school funding.
(g) On or before December 15, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.